Utah statutes.
63M-1-412.   Business entities qualifying for tax incentives.

The tax incentives described in this part are available only to a business entity for which at least 51% of the employees employed at facilities of the business entity located in the enterprise zone are individuals who, at the time of employment, reside in the county in which the enterprise zone is located.

